Tennessee statutes. Title 53 Food, Drugs And Cosmetics
Part 3

Tennessee Prescription Safety Act of 2016

53-10-301. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Prescription Safety Act of 2016”.

Acts 2016, ch. 1002, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 53-10-301 — 53-10-312 (Acts 2002, ch. 840, § 1; 2004, ch. 673, §§ 24-27; 2005, ch. 474, § 7; 2007, ch. 498, §§ 1-3; 2007, ch. 518, §§ 1-4; 2008, ch. 914, § 1; Acts 2009, ch. 228, § 1; 2011, ch. 310, §§ 1-5; 2012, ch. 575, § 1; 2012, ch. 880, §§ 1-21; 2012, ch. 915, § 1; 2012, ch. 924, §§ 1-5; 2013, ch. 236, § 50; 2013, ch. 430, §§ 3, 5, 6, 15; 2014, ch. 622, §§ 1, 2; 2014, ch. 791, §§ 1-6; 2014, ch. 983, § 2; 2014, ch. 1011, §§ 1, 2), concerning the Tennessee Prescription Safety Act of 2012, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2016, ch. 1002, §§ 1-12, effective April 27, 2016.

Acts 2016, ch. 1002, § 16 provided that notwithstanding this act or the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, any rule promulgated to implement the provisions of this act shall be provided to the chairs of the health committee of the house of representatives and the health and welfare committee of the senate by the secretary of state, after approval by the attorney general and reporter, at the same time the text of the rule is made available to the government operations committees of the senate and the house of representatives for purposes of conducting the review required by § 4-5-226 in order for the health committee of the house of representatives and the health and welfare committee of the senate to be afforded the opportunity to comment on the rule.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 1002, § 17. April 27, 2016.

53-10-302. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Board” means the board of pharmacy created by title 63, chapter 10, part 3;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of health;

“Committee” means the controlled substance database committee created by § 53-10-303;

“Controlled substances” means a drug, substance, or immediate precursor in Schedules I through VI defined or listed in the Tennessee Drug Control Act of 1989, compiled in title 39, chapter 17, part 4;

“Database” means the controlled substance database created by § 53-10-304;

“Department” means the department of health;

“Director” means the director of the controlled substance database, who shall be a Tennessee licensed pharmacist designated by the commissioner, in consultation with the executive director of the board of pharmacy and with the committee, to administer, maintain, and direct the operation and function of the controlled substance database;

“Dispense” means to physically deliver a controlled substance covered by this part to any person, institution, or entity with the intent that it be consumed away from the premises on which it is dispensed. “Dispense” does not include the act of writing a prescription by a practitioner to be filled at a pharmacy licensed by the board. For purposes of this part, physical delivery includes mailing controlled substances into this state;

“Healthcare practitioner,” for the purposes of this part only, means:

A person licensed, registered, or otherwise permitted to prescribe, distribute, or dispense a controlled substance in the course of professional practice;

A pharmacy, hospital, or other institution licensed, registered, or otherwise permitted to distribute, or dispense, or administer a controlled substance in the course of professional practice; or

A certified registered nurse anesthetist (CRNA) as described in § 63-7-103;

“Healthcare practitioner delegate” means any person authorized to practice pursuant to title 63, and up to two (2) unlicensed persons per healthcare practitioner designated by the healthcare practitioner to act as agents of the healthcare practitioner, upon registering the delegates and providing any information required by the department. A healthcare practitioner shall have the ability to authorize a healthcare practitioner delegate to check the controlled substance database as stipulated in this part. The healthcare practitioner shall be responsible for actions taken by their healthcare practitioner delegates pursuant to this part;

“Law enforcement personnel” means agents of the Tennessee bureau of investigation, agents of a judicial district drug task force, drug enforcement administration agents, and certified law enforcement officers certified pursuant to § 38-8-107, and certified law enforcement officers by other states;

“Manufacturer” means any person, except a pharmacist compounding in the normal course of professional practice, engaged in the commercial production, preparation, propagation, conversion, or processing of a drug, either directly or indirectly, by extraction from substances of natural origin or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or both, and includes any packaging or repackaging of a drug or the labeling or relabeling of its container and the promotion and marketing of such drugs or devices;

“Operations committee” means the operations committee created by this part to consult with and confirm or deny decisions made by the commissioner within the authority granted to the commissioner by this part; and

“Wholesaler” or “wholesale distributor” means a person primarily engaged in the wholesale distribution of drugs or devices; provided, that “wholesaler” or “wholesale distributor” does not include licensed third-party logistics providers. For the purposes of this part, transfers and sales of drugs or devices from one (1) licensed pharmacy to another shall not constitute wholesale distribution of drugs or devices.

Acts 2016, ch. 1002, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 53-10-301 — 53-10-312 (Acts 2002, ch. 840, § 1; 2004, ch. 673, §§ 24-27; 2005, ch. 474, § 7; 2007, ch. 498, §§ 1-3; 2007, ch. 518, §§ 1-4; 2008, ch. 914, § 1; Acts 2009, ch. 228, § 1; 2011, ch. 310, §§ 1-5; 2012, ch. 575, § 1; 2012, ch. 880, §§ 1-21; 2012, ch. 915, § 1; 2012, ch. 924, §§ 1-5; 2013, ch. 236, § 50; 2013, ch. 430, §§ 3, 5, 6, 15; 2014, ch. 622, §§ 1, 2; 2014, ch. 791, §§ 1-6; 2014, ch. 983, § 2; 2014, ch. 1011, §§ 1, 2), concerning the Tennessee Prescription Safety Act of 2012, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2016, ch. 1002, §§ 1-12, effective April 27, 2016.

Acts 2016, ch. 1002, § 16 provided that notwithstanding this act or the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, any rule promulgated to implement the provisions of this act shall be provided to the chairs of the health committee of the house of representatives and the health and welfare committee of the senate by the secretary of state, after approval by the attorney general and reporter, at the same time the text of the rule is made available to the government operations committees of the senate and the house of representatives for purposes of conducting the review required by § 4-5-226 in order for the health committee of the house of representatives and the health and welfare committee of the senate to be afforded the opportunity to comment on the rule.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 1002, § 17. April 27, 2016.

53-10-303. Controlled substance database committee. [Effective until July 1, 2023. See version effective on July 1, 2023.]

There is created the controlled substance database committee. The committee members shall be:

One (1) of the governor-appointed licensed members of each of the following healthcare professional licensure boards or committees to be chosen by the licensing board or committee:

The board of medical examiners;

The board of osteopathic examination;

The board of dentistry;

The board of podiatric medical examiners;

The board of optometry;

The board of veterinary medical examiners;

The board of nursing;

The board of medical examiners' committee on physician assistants; and

The board of pharmacy; and

One (1) of the members of the board of pharmacy and one (1) of the members of the board of medical examiners who were appointed to those boards to represent the general public. The boards shall choose those representatives.

The committee shall have a chair and vice chair, who shall be elected annually from its members.

The committee shall meet at least annually and as often as deemed necessary either at the call of the chair or upon request of at least three (3) members of the committee. A quorum for purposes of official actions by the committee shall be seven (7) members.

The members of the committee chosen to serve by the respective licensure boards and committees, while serving on this committee, shall be deemed to be performing official duties as members of their respective board or committee and shall be entitled to the same per diem and travel reimbursements as they would receive for performing their duties for their respective board or committee. The respective board or committee of each member shall pay such per diem and travel reimbursement.

At all times, except when considering, reviewing, discussing, advising, or taking action in reference to specifically named individuals or healthcare practitioners identified from information contained in, or reported to the database, the committee shall be subject to title 8, chapter 44, part 1, regarding public meetings.

Pursuant to § 53-10-311 and the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, the commissioner shall have the authority to promulgate rules as necessary for implementation of this part regarding:

Establishing, maintaining, and operating the database;

Access to the database and how access is obtained;

Control and dissemination of data and information in the database;

The control, sharing, and dissemination of data and information in the database with other states or other entities acting on behalf of a state; and

Establishing the morphine milligram equivalent calculation for an opioid drug contained in Schedules II-V for purposes of § 63-1-164; provided, that if no such rule is promulgated for an opioid drug, the morphine milligram equivalent calculation established by the federal centers for disease control and prevention for that drug shall be used.

The committee shall advise the commissioner with respect to any contemplated rulemaking under this part. The committee may make formal recommendations to the commissioner.

The committee and the commissioner shall have the right to examine database information to identify unusual patterns of prescribing, distributing, or dispensing controlled substances that appear to be higher than normal, taking into account the particular specialty, circumstances, patient type, or location of the healthcare practitioner.

If the committee or the commissioner determines that a healthcare practitioner has an unusually high pattern of prescribing, distributing, or dispensing controlled substances that is not explained by other factors, the committee or the commissioner shall refer the healthcare practitioner to the appropriate licensing board.

If an investigator in service of a health-related board as licensed under title 63 or title 68 has reason to believe during any part of an investigation that a healthcare practitioner is in violation of a criminal law, the investigator is authorized to report the conduct to the appropriate law enforcement personnel.

Acts 2016, ch. 1002, § 3; 2018, ch. 1039, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 53-10-301 — 53-10-312 (Acts 2002, ch. 840, § 1; 2004, ch. 673, §§ 24-27; 2005, ch. 474, § 7; 2007, ch. 498, §§ 1-3; 2007, ch. 518, §§ 1-4; 2008, ch. 914, § 1; Acts 2009, ch. 228, § 1; 2011, ch. 310, §§ 1-5; 2012, ch. 575, § 1; 2012, ch. 880, §§ 1-21; 2012, ch. 915, § 1; 2012, ch. 924, §§ 1-5; 2013, ch. 236, § 50; 2013, ch. 430, §§ 3, 5, 6, 15; 2014, ch. 622, §§ 1, 2; 2014, ch. 791, §§ 1-6; 2014, ch. 983, § 2; 2014, ch. 1011, §§ 1, 2), concerning the Tennessee Prescription Safety Act of 2012, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2016, ch. 1002, §§ 1-12, effective April 27, 2016.

The controlled substance database advisory committee, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2023. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-244.

Acts 2016, ch. 546, § 3 provided that the representatives of the controlled substance database advisory committee shall appear before the government operations joint evaluation committee on education, health and general welfare no later than November 18, 2016, to update the joint evaluation committee on the advisory committee's progress in addressing the findings set forth in the October 2015 performance audit report issued by the division of state audit.

Acts 2016, ch. 1002, § 16 provided that notwithstanding this act or the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, any rule promulgated to implement the provisions of this act shall be provided to the chairs of the health committee of the house of representatives and the health and welfare committee of the senate by the secretary of state, after approval by the attorney general and reporter, at the same time the text of the rule is made available to the government operations committees of the senate and the house of representatives for purposes of conducting the review required by § 4-5-226 in order for the health committee of the house of representatives and the health and welfare committee of the senate to be afforded the opportunity to comment on the rule.

Acts 2018, ch. 1039, § 9 provided that sections 1 and 6 of the act, which amended this section and enacted § 63-1-164, shall terminate on July 1, 2023, and the law in effect prior to July 1, 2018 shall be restored.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2018 until July 1, 2023, added (f)(5); and rewrote the introductory language of (f) which read: “The commissioner shall have the authority to promulgate rules, pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, necessary for implementation of this part. Pursuant to § 53-10-311 the commissioner may promulgate rules regarding:”

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 1002, § 17. April 27, 2016.

Acts 2018, ch. 1039, § 10. July 1, 2018; provided that for the purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect May 21, 2018.

53-10-303. Controlled substance database committee. [Effective on July 1, 2023. See version effective until July 1, 2023.]

There is created the controlled substance database committee. The committee members shall be:

One (1) of the governor-appointed licensed members of each of the following healthcare professional licensure boards or committees to be chosen by the licensing board or committee:

The board of medical examiners;

The board of osteopathic examination;

The board of dentistry;

The board of podiatric medical examiners;

The board of optometry;

The board of veterinary medical examiners;

The board of nursing;

The board of medical examiners' committee on physician assistants; and

The board of pharmacy; and

One (1) of the members of the board of pharmacy and one (1) of the members of the board of medical examiners who were appointed to those boards to represent the general public. The boards shall choose those representatives.

The committee shall have a chair and vice chair, who shall be elected annually from its members.

The committee shall meet at least annually and as often as deemed necessary either at the call of the chair or upon request of at least three (3) members of the committee. A quorum for purposes of official actions by the committee shall be seven (7) members.

The members of the committee chosen to serve by the respective licensure boards and committees, while serving on this committee, shall be deemed to be performing official duties as members of their respective board or committee and shall be entitled to the same per diem and travel reimbursements as they would receive for performing their duties for their respective board or committee. The respective board or committee of each member shall pay such per diem and travel reimbursement.

At all times, except when considering, reviewing, discussing, advising, or taking action in reference to specifically named individuals or healthcare practitioners identified from information contained in, or reported to the database, the committee shall be subject to title 8, chapter 44, part 1, regarding public meetings.

The commissioner shall have the authority to promulgate rules, pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, necessary for implementation of this part. Pursuant to § 53-10-311 the commissioner may promulgate rules regarding:

Establishing, maintaining, and operating the database;

Access to the database and how access is obtained;

Control and dissemination of data and information in the database; and

The control, sharing, and dissemination of data and information in the database with other states or other entities acting on behalf of a state.

The committee shall advise the commissioner with respect to any contemplated rulemaking under this part. The committee may make formal recommendations to the commissioner.

The committee and the commissioner shall have the right to examine database information to identify unusual patterns of prescribing, distributing, or dispensing controlled substances that appear to be higher than normal, taking into account the particular specialty, circumstances, patient type, or location of the healthcare practitioner.

If the committee or the commissioner determines that a healthcare practitioner has an unusually high pattern of prescribing, distributing, or dispensing controlled substances that is not explained by other factors, the committee or the commissioner shall refer the healthcare practitioner to the appropriate licensing board.

If an investigator in service of a health-related board as licensed under title 63 or title 68 has reason to believe during any part of an investigation that a healthcare practitioner is in violation of a criminal law, the investigator is authorized to report the conduct to the appropriate law enforcement personnel.

Acts 2016, ch. 1002, § 3; 2018, ch. 1039, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 53-10-301 — 53-10-312 (Acts 2002, ch. 840, § 1; 2004, ch. 673, §§ 24-27; 2005, ch. 474, § 7; 2007, ch. 498, §§ 1-3; 2007, ch. 518, §§ 1-4; 2008, ch. 914, § 1; Acts 2009, ch. 228, § 1; 2011, ch. 310, §§ 1-5; 2012, ch. 575, § 1; 2012, ch. 880, §§ 1-21; 2012, ch. 915, § 1; 2012, ch. 924, §§ 1-5; 2013, ch. 236, § 50; 2013, ch. 430, §§ 3, 5, 6, 15; 2014, ch. 622, §§ 1, 2; 2014, ch. 791, §§ 1-6; 2014, ch. 983, § 2; 2014, ch. 1011, §§ 1, 2), concerning the Tennessee Prescription Safety Act of 2012, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2016, ch. 1002, §§ 1-12, effective April 27, 2016.

The controlled substance database advisory committee, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2023. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-244.

Acts 2016, ch. 546, § 3 provided that the representatives of the controlled substance database advisory committee shall appear before the government operations joint evaluation committee on education, health and general welfare no later than November 18, 2016, to update the joint evaluation committee on the advisory committee's progress in addressing the findings set forth in the October 2015 performance audit report issued by the division of state audit.

Acts 2016, ch. 1002, § 16 provided that notwithstanding this act or the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, any rule promulgated to implement the provisions of this act shall be provided to the chairs of the health committee of the house of representatives and the health and welfare committee of the senate by the secretary of state, after approval by the attorney general and reporter, at the same time the text of the rule is made available to the government operations committees of the senate and the house of representatives for purposes of conducting the review required by § 4-5-226 in order for the health committee of the house of representatives and the health and welfare committee of the senate to be afforded the opportunity to comment on the rule.

Acts 2018, ch. 1039, § 9 provided that sections 1 and 6 of the act, which amended this section and enacted § 63-1-164, shall terminate on July 1, 2023, and the law in effect prior to July 1, 2018 shall be restored.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 1002, § 17. April 27, 2016.

Acts 2018, ch. 1039, § 10. July 1, 2018; provided that for the purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect May 21, 2018.

53-10-304. Controlled substance database — Director — Administration — Requirements.

There is created within the department a controlled substance database. The director of the controlled substance database shall be responsible for determining staffing in consultation with the executive director of the board of pharmacy.

The director shall administer, maintain, and direct the functioning of the database in accordance with this part. The department in consultation with the committee and board may, under state procurement laws, contract with another state agency or private entity to establish, operate, or maintain the database. Additionally, the department, in consultation with the committee and board, shall determine whether to operate the database within the department or contract with another entity to operate the database, based on an analysis of costs and benefits.

The purpose of the database is to increase the quality of patient care by equipping healthcare practitioners with accurate, timely information that the practitioners can use to determine when patients acquiring controlled substances may require counseling or intervention for substance abuse, by collecting and maintaining data as described in this part regarding all controlled substances in Schedules II, III, and IV dispensed in this state, and Schedule V controlled substances identified by the controlled substance database committee as demonstrating a potential for abuse. Further, the database is to be used to assist in research, statistical analysis, criminal investigations, enforcement of standards of health professional practice, and state or federal laws involving controlled substances.

The data required by this part shall be submitted in compliance with this part to the database by any healthcare practitioner who dispenses a controlled substance contained in Schedules II, III, and IV, and Schedule V controlled substances identified by the committee as demonstrating a potential for abuse, or by any healthcare practitioner delegate who is designated to submit data on a healthcare practitioner's behalf. The reporting requirement shall not apply for the following:

A drug administered directly to a patient;

Complimentary packages of medicinal drugs that are labeled as a drug sample or complimentary drug dispersed to the practitioner's own patients adequate to treat the patient for a maximum of forty-eight (48) hours in the regular course of practice without the payment of a fee or remuneration of any kind;

A sample of a schedule IV or schedule V controlled substance in a quantity limited to an amount that is adequate to treat a patient for a maximum of seventy-two (72) hours or a sample of a non-narcotic schedule V controlled substance in a quantity limited to an amount that is adequate to treat a patient for a maximum of fourteen (14) days, provided without charge by a medical doctor, osteopathic physician, advanced practice nurse with certificates of fitness to prescribe, or physician assistant working at a pain management clinic from providing to that practitioner's patient;

Any drug dispensed by a licensed veterinarian; provided, that the quantity dispensed is limited to an amount adequate to treat the nonhuman patient for a maximum of five (5) days;

Any entity that is registered by the United States drug enforcement administration (DEA) as a narcotic treatment program and is subject to the recordkeeping provisions of 21 CFR 1304.24; or

Any drug dispensed or distributed by a facility; provided, that the quantity dispensed or distributed is limited to an amount that is adequate to treat the patient for a maximum of forty-eight (48) hours.

Notwithstanding subsection (c) or (d), a healthcare practitioner shall submit the dispensing of buprenorphine products in accordance with this part. However, this subsection (e) does not apply to a practitioner when reporting the dispensing of buprenorphine products would conflict with 42 CFR part 2.

Acts 2016, ch. 1002, § 4; 2018, ch. 978, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 53-10-301 — 53-10-312 (Acts 2002, ch. 840, § 1; 2004, ch. 673, §§ 24-27; 2005, ch. 474, § 7; 2007, ch. 498, §§ 1-3; 2007, ch. 518, §§ 1-4; 2008, ch. 914, § 1; Acts 2009, ch. 228, § 1; 2011, ch. 310, §§ 1-5; 2012, ch. 575, § 1; 2012, ch. 880, §§ 1-21; 2012, ch. 915, § 1; 2012, ch. 924, §§ 1-5; 2013, ch. 236, § 50; 2013, ch. 430, §§ 3, 5, 6, 15; 2014, ch. 622, §§ 1, 2; 2014, ch. 791, §§ 1-6; 2014, ch. 983, § 2; 2014, ch. 1011, §§ 1, 2), concerning the Tennessee Prescription Safety Act of 2012, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2016, ch. 1002, §§ 1-12, effective April 27, 2016.

Acts 2016, ch. 1002, § 16 provided that notwithstanding this act or the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, any rule promulgated to implement the provisions of this act shall be provided to the chairs of the health committee of the house of representatives and the health and welfare committee of the senate by the secretary of state, after approval by the attorney general and reporter, at the same time the text of the rule is made available to the government operations committees of the senate and the house of representatives for purposes of conducting the review required by § 4-5-226 in order for the health committee of the house of representatives and the health and welfare committee of the senate to be afforded the opportunity to comment on the rule.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (e).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 1002, § 17. April 27, 2016.

Acts 2018, ch. 978, § 15. July 1, 2018; provided that for rulemaking purposes, the act took effect on May 21, 2018.

Law Reviews.

The Right Hammer for the Right Nail: Public Health Tools in the Struggle Between Pain and Addiction, 48 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1300 (Summer 2018).

Defining the Opioid Crisis and the Limited Role of the Criminal Justice System Resolving It, 48 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1206 (Summer 2018).

53-10-305. Submission of information — Data format.

All healthcare practitioners who prescribe or dispense controlled substances in practice providing direct care to patients in this state by prescribing or dispensing on more than fifteen (15) days in a calendar year total and are required to have a federal drug enforcement administration (DEA) registration pursuant to federal law shall be registered in the controlled substance database. Healthcare practitioners or their agents shall have up to thirty (30) calendar days after receiving a DEA number to register in the database; such privilege shall apply equally to both prescribers and dispensers. Licensed veterinarians who never prescribe or dispense controlled substances in an amount intended to treat a nonhuman patient for more than five (5) days shall not be required to register in the database.

Each healthcare practitioner or healthcare practitioner's agent shall, regarding each controlled substance dispensed, submit to the database all of the following information:

Prescriber identifier;

Dispensing date of controlled substance;

Patient identifier;

Controlled substance dispensed identifier;

Quantity of controlled substance dispensed;

Strength of controlled substance dispensed;

Estimated days' supply;

Dispenser identifier;

Date the prescription was issued by the prescriber;

Whether the prescription was new or a refill;

Source of payment;

The ICD-10 code for any prescription that contains an ICD-10 code; provided, that this shall not be mandatory prior to January 1, 2019, for a dispenser who has not updated the dispenser's software system to enable submission of ICD-10 codes;

A value signifying opioid treatment is occurring pursuant to a medical necessity under § 63-1-164 for any prescription containing the words “medical necessity.” The value will be determined by the committee and published through the committee's website; and

Other relevant information as required by rule.

The information in the database, as required by subdivision (b)(1), shall be submitted by a procedure and in a format established by the committee, for each business day but no later than the close of business on the following business day; provided, that a veterinarian shall submit information at least once every fourteen (14) days and shall not be required to use a computerized system in order to submit required information pursuant to this section.

The commissioner, pursuant to § 53-10-311, shall have the authority to change the length of time in which healthcare practitioners are required to submit information to the database through the promulgation of rules pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. When the committee shortens the length of time in which healthcare practitioners are required to submit information to the database, the department shall provide notice to all healthcare practitioners who are registered in the database at least sixty (60) days prior to the date in which the rule goes into effect. If the committee, pursuant to § 53-10-311, shortens the length of time in which healthcare practitioners must submit information to the database, a healthcare practitioner may provide to the committee a written statement indicating why it creates a hardship for that healthcare practitioner to submit information within that time period, and the committee may grant an extension of up to seven (7) days within which that healthcare practitioner shall submit the information to the database. Such a hardship extension shall be valid for two (2) years and may be renewed by the committee upon request of the healthcare practitioner.

Any healthcare practitioner, except veterinarian healthcare practitioners, that uses a computerized system to record information concerning the dispensing of controlled substances, shall submit the required information to the database utilizing nationally recognized pharmacy telecommunications format standards.

The commissioner, pursuant to § 53-10-311, shall maintain the database in an electronic file or by other means established by the commissioner in such a manner so as not to infringe on the legal use of controlled substances, and in such a manner as to facilitate use of the database for identification of:

Prescribing and dispensing practices and patterns of prescribing and dispensing controlled substances; and

Individuals, facilities, or entities that receive prescriptions for controlled substances from healthcare practitioners, and who subsequently obtain dispensed controlled substances from a healthcare practitioner in quantities or with a frequency inconsistent with generally recognized standards of dosage for that controlled substance, or by means of forged or otherwise false or altered prescriptions.

The committee or the commissioner or a designee appointed by the committee or commissioner may review information in the database. If the committee or commissioner or their designee determines from review that a healthcare practitioner has committed a violation of the law, the committee or commissioner shall notify the entity responsible for licensure, regulation, or discipline of that healthcare practitioner and shall supply information required by the entity for an investigation of the violation of the law that may have occurred.

The commissioner, pursuant to § 53-10-311, shall by rule establish the electronic format in which the information required under this section shall be submitted to the database, and the committee shall allow for waiver of electronic reporting for individual healthcare practitioners for whom it would cause undue hardship as determined by the committee. The waiver may be valid for two (2) years from ratification by the committee.

The committee may authorize a designee to initially approve a waiver subject to ratification by the committee.

The commissioner shall ensure the database system records and maintains for reference, for a period of at least one (1) year:

The identification of each person who requests or receives information from the database;

The information provided to each person; and

The date and time the information is requested or provided.

The commissioner, in consultation with the committee, shall make rules to:

Effectively enforce the limitations on access to the database as described in this part; and

Establish standards and procedures to ensure accurate identification of individuals requesting information or receiving information from the database without a request.

Acts 2016, ch. 1002, § 5; 2018, ch. 1039, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 53-10-301 — 53-10-312 (Acts 2002, ch. 840, § 1; 2004, ch. 673, §§ 24-27; 2005, ch. 474, § 7; 2007, ch. 498, §§ 1-3; 2007, ch. 518, §§ 1-4; 2008, ch. 914, § 1; Acts 2009, ch. 228, § 1; 2011, ch. 310, §§ 1-5; 2012, ch. 575, § 1; 2012, ch. 880, §§ 1-21; 2012, ch. 915, § 1; 2012, ch. 924, §§ 1-5; 2013, ch. 236, § 50; 2013, ch. 430, §§ 3, 5, 6, 15; 2014, ch. 622, §§ 1, 2; 2014, ch. 791, §§ 1-6; 2014, ch. 983, § 2; 2014, ch. 1011, §§ 1, 2), concerning the Tennessee Prescription Safety Act of 2012, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2016, ch. 1002, §§ 1-12, effective April 27, 2016.

Acts 2016, ch. 1002, § 16 provided that notwithstanding this act or the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, any rule promulgated to implement the provisions of this act shall be provided to the chairs of the health committee of the house of representatives and the health and welfare committee of the senate by the secretary of state, after approval by the attorney general and reporter, at the same time the text of the rule is made available to the government operations committees of the senate and the house of representatives for purposes of conducting the review required by § 4-5-226 in order for the health committee of the house of representatives and the health and welfare committee of the senate to be afforded the opportunity to comment on the rule.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added present (b)(1)(L) and (b)(1)(M); and redesignated former (b)(1)(L) as present (b)(1)(N).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 1002, § 17. April 27, 2016.

Acts 2018, ch. 1039, § 10. July 1, 2018; provided that for rulemaking purposes, the act took effect on May 21, 2018.

Law Reviews.

Defining the Opioid Crisis and the Limited Role of the Criminal Justice System Resolving It, 48 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1206 (Summer 2018).